Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1901 to 81-1936 shall be known and may be cited as the Licensing of Truth and Deception Examiners Act.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 1.